Hawaii statutes.
[§431:10H-106] Rules. The commissioner
may adopt rules that include standards for full and fair disclosure setting
forth the manner, content, and required disclosures for the sale of long-term
care insurance policies, terms of renewability, initial and subsequent
conditions of eligibility, non-duplication of coverage provisions, coverage of
dependents, preexisting conditions, termination of insurance, continuation or
conversion, probationary periods, limitations, exceptions, reductions,
elimination periods, requirements for replacement, recurrent conditions, and
definition of terms. [L 1999, c 93, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next